trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 2
	Entries: 16959
	Sdefs: 94
	Paradigms: 51
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix.new2 apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix.new3

-->

<!--
        Ordigita per:
apertium-dixtools format apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix.new
apertium-dixtools sort -ignorecase -alignMonodix -stripEmptyLines -group adj,n,adv,np,vblex,vb,pr,cnjadv,cnjcoo,n_symbol,adj_symbol,np_symbol,adv_symbol,prn_symbol,det,preadv,rel,itg,det_symbol,num,ij,cnjsub apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix.new apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix.new2
apertium-dixtools fix apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix.new2 apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix.new3
-->

<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÃÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÕŒÙÚÛÜàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõœøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭąĄčČćĆđĐęĘłŁŀĿńŃőŐřšŠśŚžŽźŹżŻÆæØøÅåăĂşșȘțȚıİğĞ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acc" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="past" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="qnt" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="obj" /> 
    <sdef n="subj" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="gerpast" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pp2" /> 
    <sdef n="pp3" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="rec" /> 
    <sdef n="recdet" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="percent" /> 
    <sdef n="ciph" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="subs" /> 
    <sdef n="pres" /> 
    <sdef n="pprs" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" /> 
    <sdef n="sint" /> 
    <sdef n="unc" /> 
    <sdef n="sep" /> 
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

<pardef n="ö">
  <e>       <p><l>ö</l>         <r>ö</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>ö</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ü">
  <e>       <p><l>ü</l>         <r>ü</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ü</r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>’</l>         <r>’<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ciph"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ciph"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="separ">
<!-- <e>                           <re>[¿¡]</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="nomacc">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="nomacc0">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Paradigma ADJ -->


 
<pardef n="adj__adjINICIAL">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="a__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aj</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajn</l>       <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>aj</l>        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="e__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="jam__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tro__preadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="kaj__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="after__cnjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ke__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="al__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mine__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Paradigna NOM-->

<pardef n="o__n">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="la ilia">         <i>la<b/>ilia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la lia">          <i>la<b/>lia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la mia">          <i>la<b/>mia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la nia">          <i>la<b/>nia</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la via">          <i>la<b/>via</i><par n="mine__prn"/></e>
<e lm="aŭ">              <i>aŭ</i><par n="kaj__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="aŭstrohungara">   <i>aŭstrohungar</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="danke">           <i>dank</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="je">              <i>je</i><par n="al__pr"/></e>
<e lm="deklinacio">      <i>deklinaci</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="des pli">         <i>des<b/>pli</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ekskluzivema">    <i>ekskluzivem</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="en la dana">      <i>en<b/>la<b/>dana</i><par n="jam__adv"/></e>
<e lm="en la okcitana lingvo"><i>en<b/>la<b/>okcitana<b/>lingvo</i><par n="jam__adv"/></e>
<e lm="eĉ nun">          <i>eĉ<b/>nun</i><par n="jam__adv"/></e>
<e lm="eŭske">           <i>eŭsk</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="fare de">         <i>fare<b/>de</i><par n="al__pr"/></e>
<e lm="germanofobio">    <i>germanofobi</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="gerontokratia">   <i>gerontokrati</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="iom post"> <i>iom<b/>post</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="kaj">             <i>kaj</i><par n="kaj__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="kazaĥa">          <i>kazaĥ</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ke">              <i>ke</i><par n="ke__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="kiel">            <i>kiel</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="kiel">            <i>kiel</i><par n="kaj__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="komence de">      <i>komence<b/>de</i><par n="al__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kompatinde">      <i>kompatind</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kompromiso">      <i>kompromis</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="kune kun">        <i>kune<b/>kun</i><par n="al__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kvankam">         <i>kvankam</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="malplej">         <i>malplej</i><par n="jam__adv"/></e>
<e lm="malpli">          <i>malpli</i><par n="tro__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="marĝena">         <i>marĝen</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mespilo">         <i>mespil</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="multe">           <i>mult</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="multe da">        <i>multe<b/>da</i><par n="tro__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="ne multe">        <i>ne<b/>multe</i><par n="tro__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="nek">             <i>nek</i><par n="kaj__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="neniom">          <i>neniom</i><par n="tro__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="ol">              <i>ol</i><par n="kaj__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="pli ol">          <i>pli<b/>ol</i><par n="al__pr"/></e>
<e lm="portugalparolanto"><i>portugalparolant</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="potencialo">      <i>potencial</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="pro tio ke">      <i>pro<b/>tio<b/>ke</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="pro tio ke">      <i>pro<b/>tio<b/>ke</i><par n="kaj__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="proksime de la supro"><i>proksime<b/>de<b/>la<b/>supro</i><par n="jam__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rekte">           <i>rekt</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="spiritismo">      <i>spiritism</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
<e lm="teatra">          <i>teatr</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tial">            <i>tial</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="tiom">            <i>tiom</i><par n="tro__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="trans">           <i>trans</i><par n="al__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tre ekstere">     <i>tre<b/>ekster</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tute ne">         <i>tute<b/>ne</i><par n="tro__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="ĝis nun">         <i>ĝis<b/>nun</i><par n="jam__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ruĝete">            <i>ruĝet</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
<e lm="D">               <i>D</i><par n="ö"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pöttering">       <i>P</i><par n="ö"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separ"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
